Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.270

Stock in small business investment companies.

A savings and loan association may purchase and hold for its own investment accounts stock in small business investment companies licensed and regulated by the United States as authorized by the small business act, Public Law 85-536, as amended and now in force, in an amount not to exceed one percent of its assets.

[ 1973 c 130 s 30; 1969 c 107 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.

Definitions—1973 c 130: See RCW 33.24.350.